District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.18

Decree against sureties.

If such undertaking be approved before any suit brought, such suit shall be a suit in equity against the owner, to which the sureties may be made parties; if the undertaking be approved after suit brought, the said sureties shall ipso facto become parties to the suit, and in either case the decree of the court shall be against the sureties as well as the owner.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1387, ch. 854, § 1256

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 38-120.
1973 Ed., § 38-120.